Utah statutes.
48-3a-906.   Noncomplying name of foreign limited liability company.

(1)  A foreign limited liability company whose name does not comply with Section 48-3a-108 may not register to do business in this state until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with Section 48-3a-108.  A registered foreign limited liability company that registers under an alternate name under this Subsection (1) need not comply with Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting Business Under Assumed Name.  After registering to do business in this state with an alternate name, a registered foreign limited liability company shall do business in this state under:

(a)  the alternate name;

(b)  the foreign limited liability company's name, with the addition of its jurisdiction of formation; or

(c)  an assumed or fictitious name the foreign limited liability company is authorized to use under Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting Business Under Assumed Name.

(2)  If a registered foreign limited liability company changes its name to one that does not comply with Section 48-3a-108, it may not do business in this state until it complies with Subsection (1) by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with Section 48-3a-108.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

